Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4417
Nebraska Budget Act; not applicable; when.

The Nebraska Budget Act shall not apply to any good life district economic development program or local sources of revenue dedicated to such program.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 10.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.